District of Columbia statutes.
34-2410.02

Private fire hydrants.

The Mayor shall not approve any permit or related plan that authorizes the installation of a private fire hydrant without an agreement, to be recorded in the land records of the Recorder of Deeds, establishing the entity or person, and successors thereof, responsible for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of the private fire hydrant in perpetuity.

History

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-337, § 3, 58 DCR 609